Colorado, session 2026A, SB094.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-103, amend (3),
(5), (14)(b), and (60); and add (2.7) as follows:
44-3-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(2.7) "ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES" MEANS A
DISTINCT AND DEFINITE AREA, AS SPECIFIED IN AN ALTERNATING USE OF
PREMISES APPLICATION, THAT IS OWNED BY OR IN POSSESSION OF A PERSON
LICENSED PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-402, 44-3-403, 44-3-417, 44-3-422,
OR 44-3-426 AND WITHIN WHICH THE LICENSEE IS AUTHORIZED TO
MANUFACTURE AND STORE VINOUS LIQUORS, SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS, OR
MALT LIQUORS ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER PERSON LICENSED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 44-3-402, 44-3-403, 44-3-417, 44-3-422, OR 44-3-426 IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 3. AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED
PREMISES MUST BE ADJACENT TO THE PREMISES OF THE PERSON ON WHOSE
BEHALF THE LICENSEE IS MANUFACTURING AND STORING VINOUS LIQUORS,
SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS, OR MALT LIQUORS.
(3) "Alternating proprietor licensed premises" means a distinct
and definite area, as specified in an alternating use of premises
-2- SB26-094

application, that is owned by or in possession of a person licensed
pursuant to section 44-3-402, 44-3-403, 44-3-417, or 44-3-422, OR
44-3-426 and within which the licensee and other persons licensed
pursuant to section 44-3-402, 44-3-403, 44-3-417, or 44-3-422, OR
44-3-426 are authorized to manufacture and store vinous liquors,
SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS, or malt liquors in accordance with this article 3.
(5) "Brew pub" means a retail establishment that manufactures not
more than one million eight hundred sixty thousand gallons of malt liquor
on its licensed premises, A LICENSED ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED
PREMISES ON WHICH MALT LIQUOR IS PRODUCED ON THE BREW PUB'S
BEHALF, or ITS licensed alternating proprietor licensed premises,
combined, each calendar year.
(14) "Distillery pub" means a retail establishment:
(b) That ferments and distills not more than eight hundred
seventy-five thousand liters of spirituous liquor on its licensed premises,
ITS LICENSED ALTERNATING PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES, OR A
LICENSED ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES ON WHICH
SPIRITUOUS LIQUOR IS PRODUCED ON THE DISTILLERY PUB'S BEHALF,
COMBINED, each calendar year.
(60) "Vintner's restaurant" means a retail establishment that sells
food for consumption on the premises and that manufactures not more
than nine hundred twenty-five thousand gallons of wine on its premises,
or ITS licensed alternating proprietor licensed premises, OR A LICENSED
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES ON WHICH WINE IS PRODUCED
ON THE VINTNER'S RESTAURANT'S BEHALF, combined, each calendar year.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-202, amend
(2)(a)(I)(Q) as follows:
-3- SB26-094

44-3-202. Duties of state licensing authority - feasibility study
- rules - repeal.
(2) (a) (I) Rules adopted pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this
section may cover, without limitation, the following subjects:
(Q) Implementation, standardization, and enforcement of
alternating proprietor licensed premises AND ALTERNATING PREMISES
LICENSED PREMISES. The state licensing authority shall consult with
interested parties from the alcohol beverage industry in developing
appropriate rules to ensure adequate oversight and regulation of
alternating proprietor licensed premises AND ALTERNATING PREMISES
LICENSED PREMISES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-402, amend
(3)(c); and add (2.5) and (3)(b.5) as follows:
44-3-402. Manufacturer's license - rules.
(2.5) (a) A WINERY THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE VINOUS LIQUORS UPON AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF VINOUS LIQUORS MUST NOT
BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED AS AN ALTERNATING
PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(b) A BREWERY THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE MALT LIQUORS UPON AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF MALT LIQUORS MUST NOT BE
CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED AS AN ALTERNATING
PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(c) A DISTILLERY THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT TO
-4- SB26-094

THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS
UPON AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY
THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF SPIRITUOUS
LIQUORS MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED
AS AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(d) A WINERY, BREWERY, OR DISTILLERY THAT HOLDS A
WHOLESALER'S LICENSE PURSUANT TO SECTION 44-3-407 MAY ENGAGE IN
THE WHOLESALE SALE OF ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT THE LICENSEE
MANUFACTURED AT AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES FROM
BOTH ITS LICENSED PREMISES AND THE ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED
PREMISES WHERE THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES WERE MANUFACTURED.
(3) (b.5) A DISTILLERY THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS
UPON AN ALTERNATING PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY
THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF SPIRITUOUS
LIQUORS MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED
AS AN ALTERNATING PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES.
(c) Any winery, or brewery, OR DISTILLERY that holds a
wholesaler's license pursuant to section 44-3-407 may engage in the
wholesale sale of alcohol beverages that the licensee manufactured at an
alternating proprietor licensed premises from both its licensed premises
and the alternating proprietor licensed premises where the alcohol
beverages were manufactured.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-403, add (2.5)
as follows:
44-3-403. Limited winery license - rules.
(2.5) (a) A LIMITED WINERY THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE
-5- SB26-094

PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE VINOUS
LIQUORS UPON AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS
APPROVED BY THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF
VINOUS LIQUORS MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR
DEFINED AS AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(b) A LIMITED WINERY LICENSEE MAY ENGAGE IN THE WHOLESALE
SALE OF ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT THE LICENSEE MANUFACTURED AT AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES FROM BOTH ITS LICENSED
PREMISES AND THE ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES WHERE
THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES WERE MANUFACTURED.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-417, amend
(2)(a) introductory portion and (2)(a)(III); and add (1)(c) and (1)(d) as
follows:
44-3-417. Brew pub license - definitions.
(1) (c) A BREW PUB THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT TO
THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE MALT LIQUORS UPON AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF MALT LIQUORS MUST NOT BE
CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED AS AN ALTERNATING
PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(d) A BREW PUB MAY ENGAGE IN THE WHOLESALE SALE OF
ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT THE LICENSEE MANUFACTURED AT AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES FROM BOTH ITS LICENSED
PREMISES AND THE ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES WHERE
THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES WERE MANUFACTURED.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section,
during the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), malt liquors
-6- SB26-094

manufactured by a brew pub licensee on the licensed premises,
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, or alternating proprietor
licensed premises may be:
(III) Sold to the public in sealed containers for off-premises
consumption. Except as provided in subsection (2)(a.5) of this section,
only malt liquors manufactured and packaged by the licensee on the
licensed premises, ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, or on an
alternating proprietor licensed premises may be sold to the public in
sealed containers.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-422, amend
(2)(a) introductory portion and (2)(a)(III); and add (1)(c) as follows:
44-3-422. Vintner's restaurant license.
(1) (c) A VINTNER'S RESTAURANT THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE VINOUS
LIQUORS UPON AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES OR
ALTERNATING PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY THE
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF VINOUS LIQUORS
MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED AS AN
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES OR ALTERNATING
PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section,
during the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), vinous liquors
manufactured by a vintner's restaurant licensee on the licensed premises,
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, OR ALTERNATING
PROPRIETORSHIP LICENSED PREMISES may be:
(III) Sold to the public in sealed containers for off-premises
consumption. Only vinous liquors fermented, manufactured, and
-7- SB26-094

packaged on the licensed premises, ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED
PREMISES, or alternating proprietor licensed premises by the licensee shall
be sold in sealed containers.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-426, amend (3)
introductory portion and (3)(c); and add (2.5) as follows:
44-3-426. Distillery pub license - legislative declaration -
definition.
(2.5) A DISTILLERY PUB THAT HAS RECEIVED A LICENSE PURSUANT
TO THIS SECTION IS AUTHORIZED TO MANUFACTURE SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS
UPON AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, AS APPROVED BY
THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY, BUT RETAIL SALES OF SPIRITUOUS
LIQUORS MUST NOT BE CONDUCTED FROM AN AREA LICENSED OR DEFINED
AS AN ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES.
(3) During the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), a
licensed distillery pub may, with regard to spirituous liquors fermented
and distilled by the distillery pub licensee on the licensed premises,
ALTERNATING PREMISES LICENSED PREMISES, OR ALTERNATING
PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES:
(c) Sell its spirituous liquors to the public in sealed containers for
off-premises consumption, as long as the spirituous liquors are fermented,
distilled, and packaged on the licensed premises, ALTERNATING PREMISES
LICENSED PREMISES, OR ALTERNATING PROPRIETOR LICENSED PREMISES by
the licensee; or
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-501, amend
(3)(a)(V) as follows:
44-3-501. State fees - rules.
(3) (a) The state licensing authority shall establish fees for
-8- SB26-094

processing the following types of applications, notices, or reports required
to be submitted to the state licensing authority:
(V) Applications for alternating use of premises pursuant to
section 44-3-402 (2.5) OR (3), 44-3-403 (2)(a) OR (2.5), or 44-3-417
(1)(b) OR (1)(c), 44-3-422 (1)(c), OR 44-3-426 (2.5) OR (3), and rules
adopted pursuant to those sections;
SECTION 9. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-9- SB26-094